Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 13.7
UNIFORM DEPLOYED PARENTS
CUSTODY AND VISITATION ACT

Cross references:

For the effective date of this article, see § 14-13.7-504.

Law reviews:

For article, "Representing Military Parents Under

C

olorado's Uniform Deployed Parents

C

ustody and Visitation Act", see 43 Colo. Law. 33 (June 2014).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 AGREEMENT ADDRESSING CUSTODIAL
RESPONSIBILITY DURING DEPLOYMENT

PART 3 JUDICIAL PROCEDURE FOR GRANTING
CUSTODIAL RESPONSIBILITY DURING DEPLOYMENT

PART 4 RETURN FROM DEPLOYMENT

PART 5 MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS